Idaho, session 2025, H0092.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 63-3033, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
63-3033. EXTENSION OF TIME. (a) Taxpayers shall have an automatic ex-
tension of time for filing any return, declaration, statement or other doc-
ument required by this chapter for a period of six (6) months if on or before
the unextended due date the taxpayer has paid at least eighty percent (80%)
of the total tax due on the income tax return when it is filed, or the total
tax due on the income tax return for the prior year if a return was filed for
the prior year seven (7) months from its original due date.
(b) If, on the unextended due date, the payment required to meet the
provisions of subsection (a) of this section, after consideration of any
previous credits or payments applicable to the return, is fifty dollars
($50.00) or less, such payment shall not be required in order to qualify for
the extension. However, interest shall accrue as provided in subsection (g)
of this section. The extension of time to file a return under subsection (a)
of this section is not an extension of time for the payment of taxes. No pay-
ment of taxes shall be required to qualify for the extension to file a return
pursuant to subsection (a) of this section. Payment of any balance of tax is
due on the earlier of the extended due date or the date the return is filed.
(c) Taxpayers residing outside any of the United States and Puerto Rico
(including persons who are in military or naval service) service shall have
an automatic extension of time within which to file income tax returns with
this state for a period which that shall expire on the fifteenth day of the
sixth twelfth month following the close of their taxable year. Taxpayers re-
siding outside any of the United States and Puerto Rico who are not in mili-
tary or naval service shall have an automatic extension of time within which
to file income tax returns with this state for a period that shall expire on
the fifteenth day of the seventh month following the close of their taxable
year.
(d) Individuals who are entitled to extensions for filing federal in-
come tax returns as a result of the application of the provisions of sections
911 and 7508 of the Internal Revenue Code, shall be entitled to extensions of
time for the same period for filing income tax returns with the state of Idaho
subject to the requirements imposed in implementation of the indicated sec-
tions.


(e) Any taxpayer entitled to an extension under subsection (c) or (d) of
this section shall attach a statement to his return claiming his right to the
extension.
(f) If Unless the amount of payment made under subsection (a) of this
section by the unextended due date of the return, including all payments and
credits applicable to the return, is less than at least eighty percent (80%)
of the total tax due under the provisions of this chapter and or is less than
at least as much as the amount of the total tax due on the income tax return
for the prior year, except as permitted by subsection (b) (c) or (d) of this
section, a penalty may be applied to the total of the balance due unless rea-
sonable cause can be established. The No penalty shall be assessed if no more
than fifty dollars ($50.00) remains of the total balance due after the pay-
ments made by the unextended due date or if reasonable cause can be estab-
lished. Subject to the provisions of section 63-3046(g), Idaho Code, the
penalty shall be:
(1) If the taxes for the taxable year are paid on or before the extended
due date, two percent (2%) one percent (1%) per month from the original
due date to the date of payment.; or
(2) If the taxes for the taxable year are not paid on or before the
extended due date, the penalty provided in section 63-3046(c), Idaho
Code, from the original due date.
(g) In all cases of an extension of time in which to file any return, ex-
cept for those related to section 7508 of the Internal Revenue Code, interest
shall be paid on any tax due from the original due date to date of payment at
the rate provided in section 63-3045, Idaho Code. For an individual entitled
to an extension of time allowed by subsection (d) of this section and section
7508 of the Internal Revenue Code, interest shall be paid on any tax due from
the extended due date allowed in subsection (d) of this section to the date of
payment.
SECTION 2. This act shall be in full force and effect on and after Jan-
uary 1, 2026.